Utah statutes.
53A-22-104.   Minimal school facilities -- Lease-purchase or lease with option to purchase agreement authorized.

(1)  If a school district is unable to find any private builder who is capable of furnishing minimal school facilities in new or existing communities, on terms acceptable to the district and to the State Board of Education, the developers of the industrial plant, or plants, may agree to provide minimal school facilities under a lease-purchase agreement or lease with option to purchase agreement with the district.

(2)  The district shall pay the developers according to the terms of the agreement from sources listed for such payments in this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1988 General Session

